New Jersey, session 222, A3795.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The dependent child of a veteran who entered the United States Armed Forces in New Jersey or was a New Jersey resident upon entry into the United States Armed Forces, and either died as a result of a service-related injury or illness, is missing in action (MIA), or is totally and permanently disabled as a result of a service-related injury or illness as certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, shall be entitled to up to 60 credit hours tuition-free in a public institution of higher education associate degree program and up to 120 credit hours tuition-free in a public institution of higher education baccalaureate degree program provided that: (1)   the dependent child has no federal veterans education benefits, or no federal veterans education benefits dedicated to the payment of tuition that exceed the amount of tuition free credit hours established in this section; (2)   the dependent child is a New Jersey resident; (3)   the dependent child meets the grade point average requirements of the institutions satisfactory academic progress policy in a degree program as determined by the institutions financial aid policy; (4)   the dependent child has been accepted to pursue a course of undergraduate study and is enrolled as an undergraduate student in good standing at that institution; (5)   the dependent child has applied for all available State student grants and scholarships and all available federal student grants and scholarships for which the dependent child is eligible; (6)   the dependent child has applied for tuition benefits available through the United States Department of Veterans Affairs for which the dependent child is eligible under the "Post-9/11 Veterans Educational Assistance Act of 2008," Pub.L.110-252 (38 U.S.C. s.3301 et seq.); and (7)   available classroom space permits and tuition-paying students constitute the minimum number required for the course. b.    The State shall reimburse each public institution of higher education for the costs of waiving tuition pursuant to the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.